Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2112.02
Fire alarm installer; license; rights and privileges; experience.

On and after September 9, 1993, any person licensed as a fire alarm installer may plan, lay out, and install electrical wiring, apparatus, and equipment for only those components of fire alarm systems that operate at fifty volts or less. An applicant for a fire alarm installer license shall have at least two years experience, acceptable to the board, in planning, laying out, and installing fire alarm systems.

Laws 1993, LB 193, § 11.